Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5915.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 9. (1) Except as provided in subsections (2), (3), and (4), an individual required to be registered under this act who willfully violates this act is guilty of a felony punishable as follows: (a) If the individual has no prior convictions for a violation of this act, by imprisonment for not more than 4 years or a fine of not more than $2,000.00, or both. (b) If the individual has 1 prior conviction for a violation of this act, by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 7 2 years or a fine of not more than $5,000.00, or both. (c) If the individual has 2 or more prior convictions for violations of this act, by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 10 4 years or a fine of not more than $10,000.00, or both. (2) An individual who willfully fails to comply with section 5a, other than payment of the fee required under section 5a(6), is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 2 years or a fine of not more than $2,000.00, or both. (3) An individual who willfully fails to sign a registration and notice as provided in section 7(4) is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 93 days or a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or both. (4) An individual who willfully refuses or fails to pay the registration fee prescribed in section 5a(6) or 7(1) within 90 days of the date the individual reports under section 4a or 5a is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 90 days. (5) The court shall revoke the probation of an individual placed on probation who willfully violates this act. (6) The court shall revoke the youthful trainee status of an individual assigned to youthful trainee status who willfully violates this act. (7) The parole board shall rescind the parole of an individual released on parole who willfully violates this act. (8) An individual's failure to register as required by this act or a violation of section 5 may be prosecuted in the judicial district of any of the following: (a) The individual's last registered address or residence. (b) The individual's actual address or residence. (c) Where the individual was arrested for the violation. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.